Utah statutes.
63M-5-305.   Tax Commission -- Rules and regulations.
For the purpose of more efficiently administering this act the State Tax
Commission is authorized in its discretion to formulate, amend, or cancel
rules and regulations establishing procedures regarding matters pertaining to
the prepayment of sales or use taxes as provided in this act and the credit
against sales or use taxes as the same become due and otherwise payable.
